Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB180.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 211.190 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet shall provide public health services, including:
(1) Administrative, consultative, technical, professional, and other services needed to
assist local health departments in the effective maintenance and operation of their
departments;
(2) Administrative, investigative, and clerical services required by the secretary of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and may upon request provide these
services to any other agency of this Commonwealth authorized to control the
practice of any other healing art;
(3) Administration of grants, gifts, or contributions from the federal government, or
from other sources, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of Pub. L. No.
725 (79th Congress, 2nd Session, chapter 958), or any other acts for the same or
similar purposes;
(4) Central registrations of births, deaths, and other vital records and the furnishing of
copies thereof to the general public in the manner prescribed by law;
(5) Statistical services, including the compilation, analysis, and maintenance of
statistics on matters related to public health, and may provide these services to
organizations and persons interested in public health;
(6) Education of the public concerning all matters relating to health, including the
publication and dissemination of health information, and the stimulation of citizen
support for the promotion and maintenance of high standards of public health
throughout the Commonwealth;
(7) Survey and study of the needs of medical and hospital facilities in the interest of the
health of the general public;
(8) Establishment, maintenance, and operation of public health laboratories and such
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1826
branches thereof as may be needed;
(9) Establishment, maintenance, and operation of training facilities and schools for
employees of the cabinet and of local health departments;
(10) Tabulating, duplicating, and other ancillary services as are necessary to the
operation of the cabinet, including the keeping of adequate financial, personnel, and
other records; and
(11) Establishment, maintenance, monitoring, and enforcement of optional water
fluoridation programs for the protection of dental health, participation in which
shall solely be decided by the governing body of a water system that is subject to
regulation by the cabinet. A fluoridation program for a water system in place on
the effective date of this Act shall continue until action is taken by its governing
body to end its participation. Any decision made by the governing body of a water
system regarding its participation in a water fluoridation program established
under this subsection shall be binding on all water systems whose water is
supplied by that water system.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:37 AM Jacketed